n11.dix
<pardef n="swrI/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yaru</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yarannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yarigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yaralli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yare</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gaMd/u_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>u</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>annu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYannu</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>igeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>igoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYigeV</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>ugalYigAgi</l>
				<r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>ugalYigoskara</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>iniMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ina</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYa</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>inalli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>ugalYalli</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>e</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ugalYe</l>
                <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="swrI"><i>swrI</i><par n="swrI/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gaMdu"><i>gaMd</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kattAlYu"><i>kattAlY</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAlAlYu"><i>kAlAlY</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="guru"><i>gur</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="jagaxguru"><i>jagaxgur</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xayAlu"><i>xayAl</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
<e lm="xayAlYu"><i>xayAlY</i><par n="gaMd/u_n"/></e>
